New Jersey, session 221, A2660.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.43:21-16 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-16     (a)   (1)     Whoever makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, to obtain or increase or attempts to obtain or increase any benefit or other payment under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), or under an employment security law of any other state or of the federal government, either for himself or for any other person, shall be liable to a fine of [25%] of $250 for each offense, or 50% of the amount fraudulently obtained, whichever is greater, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, said fine when recovered shall be immediately deposited in the following manner:  10 percent of the amount fraudulently obtained deposited into the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund, and 15 percent of the amount fraudulently obtained deposited into the unemployment compensation fund; and each such false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact shall constitute a separate offense. Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (2)   For purposes of any unemployment compensation program of the United States, if the department determines that any benefit amount is obtained by an individual due to fraud committed by the individual, the department shall assess a fine on the individual and deposit the recovered fine in the same manner as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section.  As used in this paragraph, "unemployment compensation program of the United States" means: (A)  Unemployment compensation for federal civilian employees pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 8501 et seq.; (B)  Unemployment compensation for ex-service members pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 8521 et seq.; (C)  Trade readjustment allowances pursuant to 19 U.S.C. 2291-2294; (D)  Disaster unemployment assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 5177(a); (E)  Any federal temporary extension of unemployment compensation; (F)   Any federal program that increases the weekly amount of unemployment compensation payable to individuals; and (G)  Any other federal program providing for the payment of unemployment compensation. (b)   (1)     An employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person who makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits to any individual entitled thereto or to avoid becoming or remaining subject hereto or to avoid or reduce any contribution or other payment required from an employing unit under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), or under an employment security law of any other state or of the federal government, or who willfully fails or refuses to furnish any reports required hereunder (except for such reports as may be required under subsection (b) of R.S.43:21-6) or to produce or permit the inspection or copying of records, as required hereunder, shall be liable to a fine of [$100.00] $250, or [25%] 50% of the amount fraudulently withheld, whichever is greater, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, said fine when recovered to be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund; and each such false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact, and each day of such failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense. Any penalties imposed by this paragraph shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (2)   Any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person who fails to submit any report required under subsection (b) of R.S.43:21-6 shall be subject to a penalty of [$25.00] $25 for the first report not submitted within 10 days after the mailing of a request for such report, and an additional [$25.00] $25 penalty may be assessed for the next 10-day period, which may elapse after the end of the initial 10-day period and before the report is filed; provided that when such report or reports are not filed within the prescribed time but it is shown to the satisfaction of the director that the failure was due to a reasonable cause, no such penalty shall be imposed.  Any penalties imposed by this paragraph shall be recovered as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, and when recovered shall be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund. (3)   Any employing unit, officer or agent of the employing unit, or any other person, determined by the controller to have knowingly violated, or attempted to violate, or advised another person to violate the transfer of employment experience provisions found at R.S.43:21-7 (c)(7), or who otherwise knowingly attempts to obtain a lower rate of contributions by failing to disclose material information, or by making a false statement, or by a misrepresentation of fact, shall be subject to a fine of $5,000 or [25%] 50% of the contributions under-reported or attempted to be under-reported, whichever is greater, to be recovered as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, and when recovered to be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund.  For the purposes of this subsection, "knowingly" means having actual knowledge of, or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved. (c)   Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) or any rule or regulation thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under the terms of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), and for which a penalty is neither prescribed herein nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall be liable to a fine of [$50.00] $50, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, said fine when recovered to be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund; and each day such violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense. (d)   (1)     When it is determined by a representative or representatives designated by the Director of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey that any person, whether (i) by reason of the nondisclosure or misrepresentation by him or by another of a material fact [(whether or not such nondisclosure or misrepresentation was known or fraudulent)], or (ii) for any other reason, has received any sum as benefits under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) while any conditions for the receipt of benefits imposed by this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) were not fulfilled in his case, or while he was disqualified from receiving benefits, or while otherwise not entitled to receive such sum as benefits, such person, unless the director (with the concurrence of the controller) directs otherwise by regulation, shall be liable to repay those benefits in full, and any person who receives such benefits by reason of a known or fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation by him of a material fact, shall be liable to repay those benefits in full prior to collecting any future benefits payable to that person under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.).  The employer's account shall not be charged for the amount of an overpayment of benefits if the overpayment was caused by an error of the division and not by any error of the employer.  The sum shall be deducted from any future benefits payable to the individual under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) or shall be paid by the individual to the division for the unemployment compensation fund, and such sum shall be collectible in the manner provided for by law, including, but not limited to, the filing of a certificate of debt with the Clerk of the Superior Court of New Jersey, unless the individual received benefits by reason of a known or fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation by him of a material fact, in which case, the sum shall be repaid to the division prior to collecting any future benefits payable to the individual under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.); provided, however, that, except in the event of fraud, no person shall be liable for any such refunds or deductions against future benefits unless so notified before four years have elapsed from the time the benefits in question were paid. Such person shall be promptly notified of the determination and the reasons therefor. The determination shall be final unless the person files an appeal of the determination within seven calendar days after the delivery of the determination, or within 10 calendar days after such notification was mailed to his last-known address, for any determination made on or before December 1, 2010, and any initial determination made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of R.S.43:21-6 after December 1, 2010, or within 20 calendar days after the delivery of such determination, or within 20 calendar days after such notification was mailed to his last-known address, for any determination other than an initial determination made after December 1, 2010. (2)   Interstate and cross-offset of state and federal unemployment benefits.  To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of the United States, the commissioner is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements or reciprocal agreements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or the United States Secretary of Labor, or both, whereby: (A)  Overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-16 shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under the unemployment compensation law of another state, and overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under the unemployment compensation law of another state shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under R.S.43:21-1 et seq.; and (B)  Overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under applicable federal law, with respect to benefits or allowances for unemployment provided under a federal program administered by this State under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor, shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under R.S.43:21-1 et seq., or any federal program administered by this State, or under the unemployment compensation law of another state or any federal unemployment benefit or allowance program administered by another state under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor, if the other state has in effect a reciprocal agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor as authorized by subsection (g) of 42 U.S.C.s.503, and if the United States agrees, as provided in the reciprocal agreement with this State entered into under subsection (g) of 42 U.S.C.s.503, that overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-16 and overpayments as determined under the unemployment compensation law of another state which has in effect a reciprocal agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor as authorized by subsection (g) of 42 U.S.C.s.503, shall be recovered by offset from benefits or allowances otherwise payable under a federal program administered by this State or another state under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor. (e)   (1)     Any employing unit, or any officer or agent of an employing unit, which officer or agent is directly or indirectly responsible for collecting, truthfully accounting for, remitting when payable any contribution, or filing or causing to be filed any report or statement required by this chapter, or employer, or person failing to remit, when payable, any employer contributions, or worker contributions (if withheld or deducted), or the amount of such worker contributions (if not withheld or deducted), or filing or causing to be filed with the controller or the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey, any false or fraudulent report or statement, and any person who aids or abets an employing unit, employer, or any person in the preparation or filing of any false or fraudulent report or statement with intent to defraud the State of New Jersey or an employment security agency of any other state or of the federal government, or with intent to evade the payment of any contributions, interest or penalties, or any part thereof, which shall be due under the provisions of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), shall be liable for each offense upon conviction before any Superior Court or municipal court, to a fine not to exceed [$1,000.00] $1,000 or by imprisonment for a term not to exceed 90 days, or both, at the discretion of the court. The fine upon conviction shall be payable to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund.  Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (2)   Any employing unit, officer or agent of the employing unit, or any other person, who knowingly violates, or attempts to violate, or advise another person to violate the transfer of employment experience provisions found at R.S.43:21-7 (c)(7) shall be, upon conviction before any Superior Court or municipal court, guilty of a crime of the fourth degree.  For the purposes of this subsection, "knowingly" means having actual knowledge of, or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved. (f)   Any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person who aids and abets any person to obtain any sum of benefits under this chapter to which he is not entitled, or a larger amount as benefits than that to which he is justly entitled, shall be liable for each offense upon conviction before any Superior Court or municipal court, to a fine not to exceed [$1,000.00] $1,000 or by imprisonment for a term not to exceed 90 days, or both, at the discretion of the court. The fine upon conviction shall be payable to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund.  Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (g)   There shall be created in the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey an investigative staff for the purpose of investigating violations referred to in this section and enforcing the provisions thereof. (h)   An employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit who makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, to reduce benefit charges to the employing unit pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-7, shall be liable to a fine of $1,000, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14.  The fine when recovered shall be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of the fund.  Each false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact, and each day of that failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense. Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in R.S.43:21-1 et seq. (i)    The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall arrange for the electronic receipt of death record notifications from the New Jersey Electronic Death Registration System, pursuant to section 16 of P.L.2003, c.221 (C.26:8-24.1), and establish a verification system to confirm that benefits paid pursuant to the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.), and the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., are not being paid to deceased individuals. (j)    The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall arrange for the electronic receipt of identifying information from the Department of Corrections, pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1976, c.98 (C.30:1B-6), and from the Administrative Office of the Courts and any county which does not provide county inmate incarceration information to the Administrative Office of the Courts, and establish a verification system to confirm that benefits paid pursuant to the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., are not being paid to individuals who are incarcerated. (cf: P.L.2013, c.274, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.